apertium-sv-da/apertium-sv-da.da.dix
    <pardef n="veninde__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ende__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ferie__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>r</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cigaret__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ter</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dronning__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fremtid__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="morder__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="serie__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ns</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="artisten__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="havn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ryg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gen</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kritik__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ken</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bal__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>len</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ungdom__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>men</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sum__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>men</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="adresse__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="princip__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pet</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="biskop__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pens</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="embede__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ts</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kasernes__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abonnement__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="indef"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>artisten</l>
          <r>artist</r>
        </p>
        <par n="artisten__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>bal</i>
        <par n="bal__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>begyndelse</i>
        <par n="adresse__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>biskop</i>
        <par n="biskop__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>cigaret</i>
        <par n="cigaret__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>dronning</i>
        <par n="dronning__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>embede</i>
        <par n="embede__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>erstatning</i>
        <par n="abonnement__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fare</i>
        <par n="ende__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>flaske</i>
        <par n="ende__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>gave</i>
        <par n="ferie__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>have</i>
        <par n="adresse__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>havn</i>
        <par n="havn__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>hede</i>
        <par n="abonnement__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>interesse</i>
        <par n="ende__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>jagt</i>
        <par n="fremtid__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kasernes</l>
          <r>kaserne</r>
        </p>
        <par n="kasernes__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>kilde</i>
        <par n="ferie__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>kjole</i>
        <par n="ferie__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>kritik</i>
        <par n="kritik__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>kunst</i>
        <par n="fremtid__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>linie</i>
        <par n="adresse__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>lov</i>
        <par n="fremtid__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>majs</i>
        <par n="abonnement__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>mandag</i>
        <par n="fremtid__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>maskine</i>
        <par n="ende__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>metode</i>
        <par n="adresse__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>morder</i>
        <par n="morder__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>musik</i>
        <par n="kritik__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>opfattelse</i>
        <par n="adresse__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>overraskelse</i>
        <par n="ferie__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>pause</i>
        <par n="ende__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>pavillon</i>
        <par n="abonnement__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>princip</i>
        <par n="princip__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>radio</i>
        <par n="dronning__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>raket</i>
        <par n="cigaret__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>reklame</i>
        <par n="ferie__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ryg</i>
        <par n="ryg__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sandhed</i>
        <par n="fremtid__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>scene</i>
        <par n="ende__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>serie</i>
        <par n="serie__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sikkerhed</i>
        <par n="havn__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>skive</i>
        <par n="ferie__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>stamme</i>
        <par n="abonnement__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>strube</i>
        <par n="adresse__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>sum</i>
        <par n="sum__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tanke</i>
        <par n="ende__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>tirsdag</i>
        <par n="morder__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>torsdag</i>
        <par n="morder__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>trafik</i>
        <par n="kritik__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>ungdom</i>
        <par n="ungdom__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>veninde</i>
        <par n="veninde__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>videnskabs</l>
          <r>videnskab</r>
        </p>
        <par n="kasernes__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>vinge</i>
        <par n="abonnement__n"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>weekend</i>
        <par n="fremtid__n"/>
      </e>
